Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1722
Collection of taxes, personal; distress warrant uncollected; suit by county treasurer.

Upon the return of any distress warrant uncollected it shall be the duty of the treasurer, when directed so to do by the county board, to commence suit and prosecute the same to judgment, and no property whatever shall be exempt from levy and sale upon process issued on such judgment.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 157, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 6486;

C.S.1922, § 6013;

C.S.1929, § 77-1918;

R.S.1943, § 77-1722.